pt-BR: Nível de transparência: Transparente; Fosco; Opaco; Fumê; Translúcido; Outro
ja: 透明度レベル: クリア; フロスト; 不透明; ティント; 半透明; その他
zh-CN: 透明度水平: 透明; 磨砂; 不透明; 着色; 半透明; 其他
nb: Gjennomsiktighetsnivå: Gjennomsiktig; Frostet; Ugjennomsiktig; Tonet; Gjennomskinnelig; Annet
en: Transparency level: Clear; Frosted; Opaque; Tinted; Translucent; Other
ru: Уровень прозрачности: Прозрачный; Матовый; Непрозрачный; Тонированный; Полупрозрачный; Другое
ro-RO: Nivelul de transparență: Transparent; Mat/satinat; Opac; Fumuriu; Translucid; Altele
tr: Şeffaflık seviyesi: Transparan; Buzlu; Opak; Renkli; Yarı saydam; Diğer
sv: Transparensnivå: Genomskinlig; Frostad; Ogenomskinlig; Tonad; Halvgenomskinlig; Övrigt
fi: Läpinäkyvyystaso: Läpinäkyvä; Huurrettu; Läpinäkymätön; Sävytetty; Puoliläpinäkyvä; Muu
cs: Úroveň transparentnosti: Čiré; Matované; Neprůhledné; Tónované; Průsvitné; Jiné
vi: Mức độ minh bạch: Trong suốt; Phủ mờ; Đục; Có màu; Bán trong; Khác
es: Nivel de transparencia: Transparente; Esmerilado; Opaco; Tintado; Translúcido; Otro
zh-TW: 透明度等級: 透明; 霧面; 不透明; 有色; 半透明; 其他
bg-BG: Ниво на прозрачност: Прозрачен; Матиран; Непрозрачен; Тониран; Полупрозрачен; Друго
hr-HR: Razina transparentnosti: Prozirno; Matirano; Neprozirno; Zatamnjeno; Poluprozirno; Ostalo
ko: 투명성 수준: 투명; 반투명; 불투명; 틴팅; 반투명; 기타
nl: Transparantieniveau: Transparant; Gematteerd; Ondoorzichtig; Getint; Doorschijnend; Overig
pt-PT: Nível de transparência: Transparente; Fosco; Opaco; Escurecido; Translúcido; Outro
el: Επίπεδο διαφάνειας: Διάφανο; Θαμπό; Αδιαφανές; Φιμέ; Ημιδιαφανές; Άλλο
da: Gennemsigtighedsniveau: Gennemsigtig; Matteret; Uigennemsigtig; Tonet; Gennemskinnelig; Andet
de: Transparenzgrad: Transparent; Mattiert; Blickdicht; Getönt; Durchscheinend; Sonstige
hu: Átlátszósági szint: Átlátszó; Mattított; Átlátszatlan; Színezett; Áttetsző; Egyéb
th: ระดับความโปร่งใส: โปร่งใส; ฝ้า; ทึบแสง; ติดฟิล์มสี; โปร่งแสง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Stopnja prosojnosti: Prozorno; Motno; Neprosojno; Zatemnjeno; Prosojno; Drugo
lt-LT: Skaidrumo lygis: Skaidrus; Matinis; Nepermatomas; Tamsintas; Pusiau skaidrus; Kita
it: Livello di trasparenza: Trasparente; Smerigliato; Opaco; Colorato; Traslucido; Altro
fr: Niveau de transparence: Transparent; Givré; Opaque; Teinté; Translucide; Autre
sk-SK: Úroveň transparentnosti: Priehľadné; Matné; Nepriehľadné; Tónované; Priesvitné; Iné
pl: Poziom przezierności: Przezroczysty; Matowy; Nieprzezroczysty; Przyciemniany; Półprzezroczysty; Inny